Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2764.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 2, article 3, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-262, to read: START_STATUTE15-262. State seal of computer science proficiency program; requirements; diploma A. The superintendent of public instruction shall establish a state seal of computer science proficiency program to recognize students who graduate from a school operated by a school district or a charter school located in this state and who have attained a high level of proficiency in computer science. B. The superintendent of public instruction shall: 1. Create a state seal of computer science proficiency, which shall be affixed to the diploma and noted on the transcript of a student to recognize that the student has met the requirements prescribed in this section. 2. Deliver the state seal of computer science proficiency to each public school district or charter school that participates in the program. C. Any school district or charter school may voluntarily participate in the state seal of computer science proficiency program by notifying the superintendent of public instruction of the school district's or charter school's intent to participate. D. Each school district governing board or charter school governing body that participates in the state seal of computer science proficiency program shall: 1. Identify the students who have met the requirements to be awarded the state seal of computer science proficiency. 2. Affix the state seal of computer science proficiency to the diploma and note the receipt of the state seal of computer science proficiency on the transcript of each student who meets those requirements. E. The state board of education: 1. shall adopt minimum requirements for the program established pursuant to this section.  The state board shall collaborate with the department of education and experts in computer science education to develop minimum requirements PURSUANT TO THIS paragraph. 2. may adopt rules as necessary to carry out the purposes of this section. F. A school district or charter school that participates in the state seal of computer science proficiency program established pursuant to this section shall award a student, on graduation from high school, a high school diploma with a state seal of computer science proficiency if the student demonstrates proficiency in computer science by meeting the requirements adopted pursuant to subsection E of this section. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 4, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 5, 2026.